Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.950

Fire service training center bond retirement account of 1977.

The state fire service training center bond retirement account of 1977 is hereby reestablished as an account within the treasury for the purpose of the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to chapter 349, Laws of 1977 ex. sess., or chapter 470, Laws of 1985 or, if the legislature so determines, for any bonds and notes hereafter authorized and issued for the commission for vocational education or the statutory successor to its powers and duties involving the state fire training center.

The state finance committee, on or before June 30th of each year, shall certify to the state treasurer the amount required in the next succeeding twelve months for the payment of the principal of and the interest coming due on such bonds. The state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state treasury and deposit in the state general obligation bond retirement fund such amounts and at such times as are required by the bond proceedings.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 79. Formerly RCW 43.63A.380.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.